Arkansas, session 2025, HB1147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Secretary of State for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) Q171U SEC OF STATE CHIEF DEPUTY 1 $145,515
(2) Q172U SEC OF STATE DEPUTY 2 $130,400
(3) Q174U SEC OF STATE SENIOR INFO TECHNICIAN 1 $120,086
(4) Q173U SEC OF STATE GENERAL COUNSEL 1 $116,857
(5) Q175U SEC OF STATE INFO TECHNICIAN 1 $107,930
(6) Q178U SEC OF STATE CAPITOL POLICE CHIEF 1 $104,724
*JAR035*
03-12-2025 15:29:15 JAR035

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1147
(7) Q176U SEC OF STATE DEPARTMENT DIRECTOR 7 $104,724
(8) Q177U SEC OF STATE ASSOCIATE COUNSEL 1 $93,852
(9) Q179U SEC OF STATE SYSTEMS ANALYST 1 $86,688
(10) Q184U SEC OF STATE BUDGET ANALYST 1 $84,110
(11) Q183U SEC OF STATE DEPARTMENT MANAGER 1 $84,110
(12) Q182U SEC OF STATE SENIOR SUPERVISOR 1 $84,110
(13) Q181U SEC OF STATE CAPITOL POLICE CAPTAIN 1 $84,110
(14) Q440U SEC OF STATE CAPITOL POLICE LIEUTENANT 1 $80,000
(15) Q441U SEC OF STATE TRAINING SERGEANT 1 $78,500
(16) Q190U SEC OF STATE INFO TECH ANALYST 1 $77,694
(17) Q185U SEC OF STATE PROGRAMMER ANALYST 2 $77,694
(18) Q197U SEC OF STATE PROJECT COORDINATOR II 3 $75,382
(19) Q192U SEC OF STATE DEPARTMENT SUPERVISOR 2 $75,382
(20) Q188U SEC OF STATE TRADE SUPERVISOR 2 $75,382
(21) Q187U SEC OF STATE POLICE SERGEANT 6 $75,382
(22) Q186U SEC OF STATE ASSISTANT DIRECTOR 3 $75,382
(23) Q195U SEC OF STATE INFO TECH ADMINISTRATOR 2 $69,633
(24) Q231U SEC OF STATE PROJECT COORDINATOR I 4 $67,560
(25) Q212U SEC OF STATE BLDGS & GRND SUPERVISOR I 3 $67,560
(26) Q201U SEC OF STATE POLICE CORPORAL 39 $67,560
(27) Q198U SEC OF STATE BUSINESS ACCOUNTANT II 3 $67,560
(28) Q194U SEC OF STATE CREATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 $67,560
(29) Q193U SEC OF STATE MASTER TRADESPERSON 2 $67,560
(30) Q191U SEC OF STATE ELECTION COORDINATOR 5 $67,560
(31) Q180U SEC OF STATE PUBLIC EVENTS COORD 1 $67,560
(32) Q199U SEC OF STATE INFO TECH SPECIALIST 1 $62,411
(33) Q210U SEC OF STATE CORPORATIONS REP III 4 $60,552
(34) Q209U SEC OF STATE TRADESPERSON 2 $60,552
(35) Q208U SEC OF STATE MAINTENANCE WORKER II 4 $60,552
(36) Q204U SEC OF STATE EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT 4 $60,552
(37) Q203U SEC OF STATE CREATIVE SPECIALIST II 2 $60,552
(38) Q202U SEC OF STATE VOTER SVCS ADMINISTRATOR 2 $60,552
(39) Q200U SEC OF STATE CUSTOMER SVCS COORD II 3 $60,552
(40) Q215U SEC OF STATE ADMINISTRATIVE ASST III 7 $54,271
(41) Q214U SEC OF STATE FACILITIES SVC REP II 1 $54,271
(42) Q213U SEC OF STATE CREATIVE SPECIALIST I 1 $54,271
03-12-2025 15:29:15 JAR035

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1147
(43) Q211U SEC OF STATE RECORDS SPECIALIST 2 $54,271
(44) Q206U SEC OF STATE BLDG SVCS COORDINATOR 1 $54,271
(45) Q222U SEC OF STATE MAINTENANCE WORKER I 4 $48,645
(46) Q221U SEC OF STATE FACILITIES SVC REP I 4 $48,645
(47) Q219U SEC OF STATE CORPORATIONS REP II 11 $48,645
(48) Q218U SEC OF STATE BUSINESS ASSISTANT I 3 $48,645
(49) Q216U SEC OF STATE ADMINISTRATIVE ASST II 3 $48,645
(50) Q229U SEC OF STATE MAIL CLERK 1 $43,601
(51) Q225U SEC OF STATE DISPATCHER 3 $43,601
(52) Q224U SEC OF STATE CUSTODIAN II 1 $43,601
(53) Q223U SEC OF STATE CORPORATIONS REP I 4 $43,601
(54) Q220U SEC OF STATE ADMINISTRATIVE ASST I 5 $43,601
(55) Q227U SEC OF STATE CUSTODIAN I 5 $39,081
(56) Q226U SEC OF STATE BLDG SVCS REP 2 $39,081
(57) Q230U SEC OF STATE RECEPTIONIST I 1 $36,845
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 182

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Secretary of State - Operations for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes:
forty-five (45) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of
pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Secretary of State, to be payable from the State Central Services
Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Secretary of State
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $11,883,606
(02) EXTRA HELP 144,909
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 4,264,439
03-12-2025 15:29:15 JAR035

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1147
(04) OVERTIME 33,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 4,258,525
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 65,651
(C) PROF. FEES 205,956
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 210,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) SPECIAL MAINTENANCE 675,048
(07) BUILDING & GROUNDS MAINTENANCE 372,678
(08) ELECTION EXPENSES 3,088,029
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $25,201,841

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - CAPITOL POLICE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Secretary of State, to be payable from the State Central
Services Fund, for operating expenses of the Capitol Police of the Secretary
of State for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $692,312
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 157,285
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $849,597

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - CAPITOL GROUNDS MONUMENT/MEMORIAL
PRESERVATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the Secretary of State, to be
payable from the Capitol Grounds Monument And Memorial Preservation Fund, for
various construction and operating expenses for the preservation of Monuments
and Memorials on the State Capitol Grounds by the Secretary of State for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
03-12-2025 15:29:15 JAR035

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1147
(01) VARIOUS OPERATING & CONSTRUCTION
EXPENSES FOR MONUMENT/MEMORIAL
PRESERVATION $77,456

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE CAPITOL BUILDINGS & GROUNDS
RESTORATION - CASH. There is hereby appropriated, to the Secretary of State,
to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, from contributions and
donations for maintenance and restoration projects by the Secretary of State
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $25,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $25,000

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - ADMINISTRATIVE & MAINTENANCE - CASH. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Secretary of State, to be payable from cash
funds as defined by Arkansas Code §19-4-801, for various operating and
associated expenses for administrative and maintenance expenses for the State
Capitol grounds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) VARIOUS ADMINISTRATIVE & MAINTENANCE
EXPENSES $1,000,000

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - FEE AND TAX REFUNDS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Secretary of State, to be payable from the Miscellaneous
Revolving Fund, for refunds and reimbursements of corporate filings fees and
franchise taxes for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
03-12-2025 15:29:15 JAR035

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1147

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS $550,000

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - COUNTY VOTING SYSTEM GRANT FUND. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Secretary of State, to be payable from the County
Voting System Grant Fund, for professional fees and services for upgrading or
purchasing county voting systems, grants and aid for voting system equipment,
programming, maintenance or equipment and devices used to view voter
registration records at a polling location and refunds/reimbursements of fees
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) COUNTY VOTING SYSTEMS GRANT $11,000,000

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS VIDEO SERVICE ACT. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Secretary of State, to be payable from the
Arkansas Video Service Fund, for the review and issue of certificates of
franchise authority and refunds/reimbursements of the Arkansas Video Service
Act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ARKANSAS VIDEO SERVICE ACT $25,000

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - NATIONAL STATUARY HALL COLLECTION. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Secretary of State, to be payable from the
National Statuary Hall Collection Trust Fund, for placement and replacement
of Arkansas statues in the National Statuary Hall Collection in the United
States Capitol as provided under § 1-4-134 for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the sum of................................................$750,000.

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - HELP AMERICA VOTE ACT - FEDERAL. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Secretary of State, to be payable from the
03-12-2025 15:29:15 JAR035

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1147
federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
expenditures requiring state matching for maintenance, operating expenses and
associated costs for the Help America Vote Act for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the sum of.........................................$4,000,000.

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - GIFT SHOP AND CAFE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Secretary of State, to be payable from the cash funds as
defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services and miscellaneous
operating expenses of the Gift Shop and Cafe of the Secretary of State for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the sum of....................$490,000.

SECTION 14. APPROPRIATION - BUSINESS AND COMMERCIAL SERVICES ELECTRONIC
FILING SYSTEM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Secretary of State, to
be payable from the Secretary of State Business and Commercial Services
Electronic Filing System Fund, for the maintenance and support of the
business and commercial services electronic filing system of the Business and
Commercial Services Electronic Filing System for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the sum of..............................................$1,080,000.

SECTION 15. APPROPRIATION - SECURITY. There is hereby appropriated to
the Secretary of State, to be payable from the cash funds deposited in the
State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
security of the Arkansas State Capitol and grounds for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2025, the sum of.........................................$3,100,000.

SECTION 16. APPROPRIATION - SECURITY. There is hereby appropriated to
the Secretary of State, to be payable from the cash funds deposited in the
State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
security of the Arkansas State Capitol and grounds for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the sum of.........................................$3,100,000.

SECTION 17. APPROPRIATION - HVAC UPGRADE. There is hereby
appropriated to the Secretary of State, to be payable from the cash funds
deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for HVAC upgrade to North End of State Capitol building for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the sum of.....................$9,100,000.
03-12-2025 15:29:15 JAR035

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1147

SECTION 18. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
TRANSFER PROVISION. After receiving approval from the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State, and prior review by the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee, the Agency is authorized to transfer appropriation from any
line item authorized in Operations appropriation to any other line item
authorized in Operations appropriation.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 19. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
PERMANENT GIFT SHOP. The Arkansas Secretary of State shall operate a gift
shop to be permanently located in a space on the first floor of the State
Capitol Building. It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State to maintain
a space on the first floor of the State Capitol Building for the use of a
gift shop. The Arkansas Secretary of State is prohibited from removing a
gift shop from the first floor of the State Capitol Building or to nullify or
void the provisions of this section. A space on the first floor of the State
Capitol Building shall be the only location for the Arkansas Secretary of
State gift shop operations and shall be the only location items of the
Arkansas Secretary of State gift shop are sold to the public.

SECTION 20. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE
ARKANSAS CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
FUNDING TRANSFER - SECURITY. Immediately upon the effective date of this
section, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall transfer on his or her
books and those of the State Treasurer and the Auditor of the State the sum
of three million, one hundred thousand dollars ($3,100,000) from the General
Revenue Allotment Reserve Fund to the cash fund deposited in the State
Treasury to provide funds for security of the Arkansas State Capitol and
grounds.
The provisions for this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 through June 30, 2025.

03-12-2025 15:29:15 JAR035

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1147
SECTION 21. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 22. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 23. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2026 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided; with the
exception that Sections 15 and 20 in this Act shall be in full force and
effect from and after the date of its passage and approval; and that in the
event of an extension of the Session, the delay in the effective date of this
Act beyond July 1, 2026, with the exception that Sections 15 and 20 in this
Act shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage
and approval, could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and
provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is
hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force
and effect from and after July 1, 2026; with the exception of Sections 15 and
20 in this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of
its passage and approval.
03-12-2025 15:29:15 JAR035

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1147

/s/Joint Budget Committee


































03-12-2025 15:29:15 JAR035